Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-568
Dementia services coordinator; appointment; duties.

The department shall appoint a dementia services coordinator who shall:

(1) Serve as a referral point for linking families caring for individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia with supportive services and resources;

(2) Provide information, counseling, education, and referral about services and programs, including safe, secure environments that support individuals and families dealing with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia;

(3) Collect and monitor data related to the impact of Alzheimer's disease and other dementia on residents of this state;

(4) Evaluate the needs of individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia and their caregivers and identify the services, resources, and policies required to address such needs;

(5) Recommend strategies for coordination of services and resources among agencies involved in the delivery of services to individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia;

(6) Monitor and assist development and implementation of the state plan for meeting the needs of individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia and their caregivers;

(7) Recommend policies, legislation, and funding necessary to implement the state plan for meeting the needs of individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia and their caregivers;

(8) Increase awareness and create dementia-specific training to facilitate access to quality coordinated care for individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia in the most integrated setting; and

(9) Organize community stakeholders and resources to identify proactive and effective solutions.

Laws 2026, LB913, § 2.
July 18, 2026